North Dakota, session 69, HB1038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT
AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND - STATE RADAR DATA PATHFINDER PROGRAM - LEGISLATIVE
MANAGEMENT REPORT - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
strategic investment and improvements fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum
of $11,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of commerce for the
purpose of administering a state radar data pathfinder program, for the period beginning with the
effective date of this Act, and ending June 30, 2027. This funding is considered a one-time funding item.
1. The department of commerce shall collaborate with the uncrewed aircraft systems test site
established in section 54-60-28 in administering the state radar data pathfinder program and
participating in the federal radar data pathfinder program administered by the federal aviation
administration. The department of commerce shall use funding appropriated in this section to:
a. Support the integration of federal radar data with state uncrewed aircraft systems and the
beyond visual line of sight program.
b. Develop and implement security control protocols that meet federal aviation
administration radar data requirements to ensure compliance with national security
standards.
c. Enhance uncrewed aircraft systems and radar data infrastructure in the state.
d. Increase the safety and effectiveness of the operations of the uncrewed aircraft systems
test site.
e. Provide state agencies with training and technical resources to use federal radar data
securely while using the beyond visual line of sight program.
2. During the 2025-26 interim, the department of commerce shall provide a report to the
legislative management and the governor by June 30, 2026, regarding the status of the state
radar data pathfinder program, integration of the state program with the federal aviation
administration radar data pathfinder program, expenditures to date, and the effect of the
program on uncrewed aircraft system operations, safety, and data security in the state.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1038 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1038 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 84 Nays 3 Absent 6
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 40 Nays 4 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State